Utah statutes.
54-8-18.   Assessments -- Resolution to adopt.

After the public hearing has been concluded and all corrections made to the assessment list, and in the case of a municipality, after receiving the report from the board of equalization and review, the governing body shall proceed to adopt the assessment resolution.

